Washington statutes.
RCW 9.01.210

Financial, accounting services to cannabis industry.

(1) A person or entity that receives deposits, extends credit, conducts funds transfers, transports cash or financial instruments on behalf of a financial institution, or provides other financial services for a cannabis producer, cannabis processor, or cannabis retailer authorized under chapter 69.50 RCW or for a qualifying patient, health care professional, or designated provider authorized under chapter 69.51A RCW, does not commit a crime under any Washington law solely by virtue of receiving deposits, extending credit, conducting funds transfers, transporting cash or other financial instruments, or providing other financial services for the person.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101; and

(b) "Person or entity" means a financial institution as defined in RCW 30A.22.040, an armored car service operating under a permit issued by the utilities and transportation commission that has been contracted by a financial institution, or a person providing financial services pursuant to a license issued under chapter 18.44, 19.230, or 31.04 RCW.

(3) A certified public accountant or certified public accounting firm, which practices public accounting as defined in RCW 18.04.025, does not commit a crime solely for providing professional accounting services as specified in RCW 18.04.025 for a cannabis producer, cannabis processor, or cannabis retailer authorized under chapter 69.50 RCW.

[ 2022 c 16 s 2; 2018 c 68 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.